Alabama, session 2026rs, HB259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
17 Section 1. Chapter 7B, commencing with Section 8-7B-1,
18 is added to Title 8, Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
19 Chapter 7B
20 §8-7B-1
21 (a) This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the
22 Financial Innovation and Market Expansion Act.
23 (b) The intent of this chapter is to implement Section
24 4(c) of the federal Guiding and Establishing National
25 Innovation for U.S. Stablecoins Act, 12 U.S.C. § 5903(c),
26 governing regulation of payment stablecoins at the state
27 level.
28 §8-7B-2
Page 1

§8-7B-2
HB259 Enrolled
29 For the purposes of this act, the following terms have
30 the following meanings:
31 (1) ALABAMA QUALIFIED PAYMENT STABLECOIN ISSUER. A
32 stablecoin issuer licensed and approved by the commission
33 through the licensing process in Section 8-7B-5.
34 (2) AUTHORIZED PAYMENT STABLECOIN. A payment stablecoin
35 issued by an Alabama qualified payment stablecoin issuer.
36 (3) COMMISSION. The Alabama Securities Commission.
37 (4) COMPTROLLER. The Office of the Comptroller of the
38 Currency.
39 (5) DIGITAL ASSET SERVICE PROVIDER. A person that, in
40 the United States and for compensation or profit, engages in
41 the business of exchanging digital assets for monetary value,
42 exchanging digital assets for other digital assets,
43 transferring digital assets to a third party, acting as a
44 digital asset custodian, or participating in financial
45 services relating to digital asset insurance. The term does
46 not include a person that engages in the business of
47 developing or operating distributed ledger protocols,
48 self-custodial software interfaces, or validating transactions
49 through a distributed ledger. The term does not include a
50 person that participates in a liquidity poll or other similar
51 mechanism for the provisioning of liquidity for peer-to-peer
52 transactions.
53 (6) GENIUS ACT. The Guiding and Establishing National
54 Innovation for U.S. Stablecoins Act, 12 U.S.C. §§ 5901-5916.
55 (7) GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY. Any state or local agency or
56 instrumentality thereof located in the state.
Page 2

instrumentality thereof located in the state.
HB259 Enrolled
57 (8) INTENTIONALLY. A person acts intentionally with
58 respect to a result or to conduct described by a statute
59 defining an offense, when his or her purpose is to cause that
60 result or to engage in that conduct.
61 (9) KNOWINGLY. A person acts knowingly with respect to
62 conduct or to a circumstance described by a statute defining
63 an offense when he or she is aware that his or her conduct is
64 of that nature or that the circumstance exists.
65 (10) OPEN, PUBLIC, OR DECENTRALIZED NETWORK. A
66 blockchain network that is open to use by the public without
67 permission of use by governing authorities or a network that
68 is operated using distributed ledger technology, where the
69 data is stored in separate physical locations.
70 (11) PAYMENT STABLECOIN. A digital asset or assets
71 designed to maintain a stable value that is, or is designed to
72 be, used as a means of payment or settlement. The issuer of
73 the token:
74 a. Is obligated to convert, redeem, or repurchase the
75 token for a fixed amount of monetary value; and
76 b. Represents, or creates the reasonable expectation,
77 that the token will maintain a stable value relative to the
78 value of a fixed amount of monetary value.
79 (12) PERMITTED PAYMENT STABLECOIN ISSUER. A person
80 formed in the United States that is one of the following:
81 a. A subsidiary of an insured depository institution
82 that has been approved to issue payment stablecoins under
83 Section 5 of the GENIUS Act, 12 U.S.C. § 5904.
84 b. A nonbank entity approved by the comptroller,
Page 3

b. A nonbank entity approved by the comptroller,
HB259 Enrolled
85 pursuant to Section 5 of the GENIUS Act, 12 U.S.C. § 5904, to
86 issue payment stablecoins.
87 c. An uninsured national bank that is chartered by the
88 comptroller and is approved by the comptroller, pursuant to
89 Section 5 of the GENIUS Act, 12 U.S.C. § 5904, to issue
90 payment stablecoins.
91 d. A federal branch that is approved by the
92 comptroller, pursuant to Section 5 of the GENIUS Act, 12
93 U.S.C. § 5904, to issue payment stablecoins.
94 e. An entity legally established under the laws of a
95 state and approved to issue payment stablecoins by a state
96 payment stablecoin regulator, including Alabama qualified
97 payment stablecoin issuers.
98 §8-7B-3
99 (a) No person may issue a payment stablecoin in the
100 state, unless that person is a permitted payment stablecoin
101 issuer.
102 (b) Beginning on July 18, 2028, no digital asset
103 service provider may offer or sell a payment stablecoin to a
104 person in the state, unless the payment stablecoin is issued
105 by a permitted payment stablecoin issuer.
106 (c) This section shall not apply to the following
107 transactions:
108 (1) Any direct transfer of payment stablecoin between
109 two individuals, each acting on his or her own behalf and for
110 his or her own lawful purposes, without the involvement of an
111 intermediary.
112 (2) Any transaction involving the receipt of payment
Page 4

(2) Any transaction involving the receipt of payment
HB259 Enrolled
113 stablecoin by an individual between an account owned by the
114 individual in the United States and an account owned by the
115 individual abroad which are offered by the same parent
116 company.
117 (3) Any transaction by means of a software or hardware
118 wallet that facilitates an individual's own custody of payment
119 stablecoin.
120 (d) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to
121 the contrary, any determination regarding banking activities
122 shall be the sole authority of the Alabama State Banking
123 Department pursuant to Title 5.
124 §8-7B-4
125 (a)(1) The commission shall receive, review, and
126 consider for approval applications from any person that seeks
127 to issue or sell payment stablecoins as an Alabama qualified
128 payment stablecoin issuer, and the commission shall establish
129 a process and framework for the licensing, regulation,
130 examination, and supervision of such entities, through the
131 adoption of rules pursuant to Section 8-7B-8.
132 (2) The commission, upon receipt of a substantially
133 complete application received under subdivision (1), shall
134 evaluate and make a determination on each application based
135 only on the criteria established under this chapter, and rules
136 adopted pursuant to this chapter.
137 (b) The commission shall consider the following factors
138 when determining whether an applicant, who submitted a
139 substantially complete application, shall be licensed as an
140 Alabama qualified payment stablecoin issuer:
Page 5

Alabama qualified payment stablecoin issuer:
HB259 Enrolled
141 (1) The ability of the applicant, based on the
142 applicant's financial condition and resources, to meet the
143 requirements set forth under 12 U.S.C. § 5903.
144 (2) Whether an individual who has been convicted of a
145 felony offense involving insider trading, embezzlement,
146 cybercrime, money laundering, financing of terrorism, or
147 financial fraud is serving as an officer or director of the
148 applicant.
149 (3) The competence, experience, and integrity of the
150 officers, directors, and principal shareholders of the
151 applicant, its subsidiaries, and parent company, including:
152 a. The record of those officers, directors, and
153 principal shareholders of compliance with laws and
154 regulations; and
155 b. The ability of those officers, directors, and
156 principal shareholders to fulfill any commitments to, and any
157 conditions imposed by, the commission in connection with the
158 application at issue and any prior applications.
159 (4) Whether the redemption policy of the applicant
160 meets the standards under 12 U.S.C. § 5903.
161 (5) Any other factors established under federal
162 regulations pursuant to the GENIUS Act or rules adopted
163 pursuant to this chapter which are necessary to ensure the
164 safety and soundness of the Alabama qualified payment
165 stablecoin issuer.
166 (c) The commission shall render a decision on a
167 substantially complete application submitted under subsection
168 (a) no later than 120 days after receipt of the application.
Page 6

(a) no later than 120 days after receipt of the application.
HB259 Enrolled
169 (d)(1) For purposes of this section an application
170 shall be considered substantially complete if the application
171 contains sufficient information for the commission to render a
172 decision on whether the applicant satisfies the factors
173 described in subsection (a).
174 (2) No later than 30 days after receiving any
175 application, the commission shall notify the applicant as to
176 whether the commission considers the application to be
177 substantially complete and, if the application is not
178 substantially complete, the additional information the
179 applicant must provide in order for the application to be
180 considered substantially complete.
181 (3) An application considered substantially complete
182 under this subsection shall remain substantially complete
183 unless there is a material change in circumstances that
184 requires the commission to treat the application as a new
185 application.
186 (e)(1) The commission may only deny a substantially
187 complete application received if the commission determines
188 that the activities of the applicant would include any conduct
189 that would authorize the commission to suspend or revoke a
190 license under Section 8-7B-9(a).
191 (2) The issuance of a payment stablecoin on an open,
192 public, or decentralized network shall not be a valid ground
193 for denial of an application.
194 (f) If the commission denies a substantially complete
195 application received under subsection (a), the commission no
196 later than 30 days after the date of denial, shall provide the
Page 7

later than 30 days after the date of denial, shall provide the
HB259 Enrolled
197 applicant with written notice explaining the denial with
198 specificity, including all findings made by the commission
199 with respect to all identified material shortcomings in the
200 application, including actionable recommendations on how the
201 applicant could address the identified material shortcomings.
202 (g) The denial of an application under subsection (e)
203 shall not prohibit the applicant from filing any subsequent
204 application.
205 §8-7B-5
206 A provider is not required to obtain any other license
207 or charter, except for the requirement under this chapter, to
208 perform the activities permitted in Section 8-7B-3.
209 §8-7B-6
210 No later than 180 days after the approval of an
211 application, and afterwards on an annual basis, each Alabama
212 qualified payment stablecoin issuer shall submit to the
213 commission a certification that the issuer has implemented
214 anti-money laundering and economic sanctions compliance
215 programs that are reasonably designed to prevent the Alabama
216 qualified payment stablecoin issuer from facilitating money
217 laundering, in particular, facilitating money laundering for
218 cartels and organizations designated as foreign terrorist
219 organizations under 8 U.S.C. § 1189 and the financing of
220 terrorist activities, consistent with the requirements of the
221 GENIUS Act.
222 §8-7B-7
223 (a) An Alabama qualified payment stablecoin issuer
224 shall comply with 12 U.S.C. § 5902(a) and any regulations
Page 8

shall comply with 12 U.S.C. § 5902(a) and any regulations
HB259 Enrolled
225 adopted by federal governmental entities implementing the
226 GENIUS Act.
227 (b) The commission, through the adoption of rules
228 pursuant to Section 8-7B-8 or other means of notice, shall
229 identify the federal laws and regulations applicable to
230 Alabama qualified payment stablecoin issuers. The commission
231 shall ensure that the minimum federal requirements apply to
232 all Alabama qualified payment stablecoin issuers in the state.
233 §8-7B-8
234 (a)(1) The commission shall adopt rules to administer
235 and implement this chapter. These rules may include provisions
236 that govern the recovery of the cost of administering and
237 enforcing this chapter by imposing and collecting fees, fines,
238 penalties, and costs associated with applications,
239 examinations, investigations, and other actions required to
240 implement this chapter.
241 (2) The rules adopted under subsection (a) shall
242 include the following:
243 a. The establishment of a secure system for processing
244 payments made using payment stablecoins.
245 b. The technical integration of payment stablecoin
246 payment systems with state accounting and payment systems.
247 c. Security and fraud prevention measures.
248 d. The creation of educational material regarding the
249 use of payment stablecoins.
250 (b) The commission may conduct an examination or
251 investigation of an Alabama qualified payment stablecoin
252 issuer or otherwise take action authorized by this chapter or
Page 9

issuer or otherwise take action authorized by this chapter or
HB259 Enrolled
253 by a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter as
254 reasonably necessary or appropriate to administer and
255 implement this chapter, federal regulations implementing the
256 GENIUS Act, and other applicable state and federal law. In
257 performing the examination or investigation, the commission
258 may:
259 (1) Conduct an on-site or off-site examination of the
260 Alabama qualified payment stablecoin issuer as the commission
261 may reasonably require;
262 (2) Conduct an examination in conjunction with other
263 state agencies or federal government agencies;
264 (3) Accept the examination report of another state
265 agency or federal government agency, or a report prepared by
266 an independent accounting firm, which, upon being accepted by
267 the commission, shall be considered an official report of the
268 commission; and
269 (4) Summon and examine, under oath, individuals or
270 employees of an Alabama qualified payment stablecoin issuer
271 and require the individuals to produce records regarding any
272 matter related to the condition and business of the licensee
273 or an agent of the licensee.
274 (c) An Alabama qualified payment stablecoin issuer
275 shall provide, and the commission shall have full and complete
276 access to, all records the commission may reasonably require
277 to conduct an examination. The records must be provided at the
278 location and in the format specified by the commission,
279 provided the commission may utilize multistate record
280 production standards and examination procedures when such
Page 10

production standards and examination procedures when such
HB259 Enrolled
281 standards will reasonably achieve the requirements of this
282 section.
283 (d) Unless otherwise directed by the commission, a
284 licensee shall pay all costs reasonably incurred in connection
285 with an examination of the licensee or the licensee's
286 authorized delegates.
287 (e) Information obtained during any examination under
288 this chapter may be disclosed only as prescribed in Section
289 8-7B-15.
290 (f) In the course of an examination or investigation
291 under subsection (b), the commission may do any of the
292 following:
293 (1) Make such public or private investigations within
294 or outside of this state as it deems necessary to determine
295 whether: (i) any license under this chapter should be granted,
296 denied, suspended, or revoked; (ii) any person has violated or
297 is about to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule
298 or order issued under this chapter; or (iii) any enforcement
299 measures are necessary to be imposed on an Alabama qualified
300 payment stablecoin issuer under this chapter.
301 (2) Require or permit any person to file a statement in
302 writing, under oath, or otherwise as the commission may
303 determine, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning
304 the matter to be investigated.
305 (3) Publish information concerning any violation of
306 this chapter or any rule or order adopted or issued under this
307 chapter.
308 (4) Administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena
Page 11

(4) Administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena
HB259 Enrolled
309 witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require
310 the production of any books, papers, correspondence,
311 memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the
312 commission deems relevant to the inquiry.
313 (g) In case of refusal to obey a subpoena, upon
314 application by the commission, the Circuit Court of Montgomery
315 County may issue an order to the person failing to obey the
316 subpoena requiring the individual to appear before the
317 commission or the officer designated by it, to produce
318 documentary evidence if so ordered, or to give evidence
319 touching the matter under investigation or in question. The
320 court may hold any person who fails to obey an order of the
321 court in contempt of court.
322 (h) No person is excused from attending and testifying
323 or from producing any document or record before the commission
324 or any officer designated by it, in any proceeding instituted
325 by the commission, on the ground that the testimony or
326 evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of the person may
327 tend to incriminate him or her or subject him or her to a
328 penalty or forfeiture. No individual may be prosecuted or
329 subjected to any penalty or forfeiture using or based on
330 information he or she offered after asserting such privilege,
331 except that the individual so testifying shall not be exempt
332 from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so
333 testifying. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the
334 commission from prosecuting any person compelled to testify or
335 provide evidence, if the commission has sufficient evidence,
336 derived from other sources not discovered, derived, or
Page 12

derived from other sources not discovered, derived, or
HB259 Enrolled
337 revealed from such compelled testimony or evidence, to sustain
338 a prosecution for a violation under this chapter.
339 (i) The commission may prescribe additional enforcement
340 procedures under subsection (a) to ensure compliance with the
341 GENIUS Act.
342 (j) The commission shall submit an annual report to the
343 Legislature which shall include the current list of authorized
344 payment stablecoins, the volume of transactions and cost
345 savings, assessment of risks and safeguards, and any
346 recommendations for legislative changes. The report shall be
347 made publicly available on the commission's website.
348 (k) This chapter shall not apply to an Alabama
349 qualified payment stablecoin issuer to the extent that federal
350 law precludes or preempts or has been determined to preclude
351 or preempt the application of the provisions of this chapter
352 to any Alabama qualified payment stablecoin issuer.
353 (l) In addition to any other exempt positions as
354 otherwise allowed by law, the exempt positions in the
355 commission shall include up to three highly trained, highly
356 specialized securities professionals.
357 §8-7B-9
358 (a) The commission may suspend or revoke a license if
359 the Alabama qualified payment stablecoin issuer:
360 (1) Violates this chapter or a rule adopted or an order
361 issued under this chapter;
362 (2) Does not cooperate with an examination or
363 investigation by the commission;
364 (3) Engages in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or
Page 13

(3) Engages in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or
HB259 Enrolled
365 gross negligence;
366 (4) The competence, experience, character, or general
367 fitness of the issuer, person in control of an issuer, key
368 individual, or responsible individual of the authorized
369 delegate indicates that it is not in the public interest to
370 permit the issuer to issue a payment stablecoin;
371 (5) Engages in an unsafe or unsound practice; or
372 (6) Is insolvent, suspends payment of its obligations,
373 or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its
374 creditors.
375 (b) In determining the severity of the violation, the
376 commission may consider the size and condition of the issuer's
377 payment stablecoin issuance, the magnitude of the loss, the
378 gravity of the violation of this chapter, and the previous
379 conduct of the person involved.
380 §8-7B-10
381 (a) If the commission determines that any person has
382 engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice
383 constituting a violation of this chapter or a rule adopted or
384 an order issued under this chapter, the commission, in its
385 discretion, may do any of the following:
386 (1) Issue an order, with or without a prior hearing or
387 notice, against the person or persons engaged in the act or
388 practice, directing them to cease and desist from engaging in
389 the act or practice.
390 (2) Issue an order appointing a receiver or conservator
391 over a respondent or the respondent's assets.
392 (3) Order restitution or disgorgement against any
Page 14

(3) Order restitution or disgorgement against any
HB259 Enrolled
393 person who has violated this chapter or any rule adopted or
394 order issued pursuant to this chapter.
395 (4) Bring an action in the Circuit Court of Montgomery
396 County to enjoin an action or practice and to enforce
397 compliance with this chapter or any rule adopted or order
398 issued pursuant to this chapter. Upon a proper showing, the
399 court may issue a temporary restraining order or permanently
400 enjoin any unlawful act or practice.
401 (b) The commission shall not be required to post a bond
402 for any actions taken pursuant to subsection (a).
403 §8-7B-11
404 (a) Any person aggrieved by an order or denial issued
405 under this chapter shall be entitled to a hearing, as
406 authorized for contested cases, pursuant to the Alabama
407 Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 22 of Title 41, if the
408 aggrieved person, within 28 days after delivery of the order
409 or denial, submits a written request for a hearing before the
410 commission. The order shall disclose the right to a hearing
411 upon written request within 28 days after delivery of the
412 order. If no timely request for a hearing is made, the order
413 shall constitute a final order of the commission.
414 (b) Any appeal from any final order of the commission
415 shall be made to the Circuit Court of Montgomery County and
416 shall be governed by the provisions of the Alabama
417 Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 22 of Title 41,
418 pertaining to judicial review.
419 §8-7B-12
420 The commission may enter into a consent order at any
Page 15

The commission may enter into a consent order at any
HB259 Enrolled
421 time with a person to resolve a matter arising under this
422 chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter.
423 A consent order must be signed by the person to whom it is
424 issued or by the person's authorized representative, and must
425 indicate agreement with the terms contained in the order.
426 §8-7B-13
427 (a) It is unlawful for any person, in connection with
428 the offer, sale, or purchase of any stablecoin, directly or
429 indirectly, to knowingly:
430 (1) Employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud a
431 person;
432 (2) Make any untrue statement of a material fact or to
433 omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the
434 statements made not misleading in the light of the
435 circumstances under which they are made; or
436 (3) Engage in any act, practice, or course of business
437 that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any
438 person.
439 (b)(1) A person that knowingly violates subsection (a)
440 shall be guilty of a Class B felony.
441 (2) The limitations period for any prosecution under
442 this section does not commence or begin to accrue until the
443 discovery of the facts constituting the deception, after which
444 the prosecution shall be commenced within five years.
445 (c) A person that intentionally makes a false
446 statement, misrepresentation, or false certification in a
447 record filed or required to be maintained under this chapter
448 or intentionally makes a false entry or omits a material entry
Page 16

or intentionally makes a false entry or omits a material entry
HB259 Enrolled
449 in such a record is guilty of a Class C felony.
450 (d) A person that intentionally engages in an activity
451 for which a license is required under this chapter without
452 being licensed under this chapter and who receives more than
453 five thousand dollars ($5,000) in compensation within a 30-day
454 period from this activity is guilty of a Class C felony.
455 (e) A person that intentionally engages in an activity
456 for which a license is required under this chapter without
457 being licensed under this chapter and who receives five
458 thousand dollars ($5,000) or less in compensation within a
459 30-day period from this activity is guilty of a Class D
460 felony.
461 (f) The enforcement of this chapter shall be vested in
462 the commission. It is the duty of the commission to enforce
463 this chapter and to investigate, prevent, and detect
464 violations of this chapter. The commission is vested with the
465 rights, privileges, and powers conferred by law upon district
466 attorneys, including the power to appear before grand juries
467 and to interrogate witnesses before such grand jury. A
468 district attorney may empower the commission to proceed on his
469 or her behalf in any proceeding under this chapter.
470 (g) In any proceeding under this chapter, intent or
471 knowledge need not be alleged and proved in prosecutions of
472 violations involving unlicensed issuers.
473 (h) A proceeding under this chapter shall not preempt
474 or foreclose any criminal action or liability which may arise
475 under any other criminal provision.
476 §8-7B-14
Page 17

§8-7B-14
HB259 Enrolled
477 (a) The commission may assess a civil penalty against a
478 person that violates this chapter or a rule adopted or an
479 order issued under this chapter in an amount not to exceed one
480 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per day for each day the
481 violation is outstanding, plus the state's costs and expenses
482 for the investigation and prosecution of the matter, including
483 reasonable attorney fees. All assessments collected under this
484 section shall be deposited in the State General Fund.
485 (b) The commission may assess an administrative charge
486 for the actual cost of any investigation resulting from any
487 violation of this chapter, a violation of any rule or order
488 issued under this chapter, or the cost of any examination made
489 by the commission pursuant to this chapter, to the person or
490 persons subject to the investigation or examination. All
491 charges assessed for costs shall be deposited in the Alabama
492 Securities Commission Fund in the State Treasury to be drawn
493 upon by the commission for its use in the administration of
494 this chapter.
495 (c) For the purposes of determining the amount or
496 extent of an administrative assessment, if any, to be imposed
497 under this section, the commission shall consider among other
498 factors, the frequency, persistence, and willfulness of the
499 conduct constituting a violation of any provision of this
500 chapter or any rule or order issued under this chapter, and
501 the number of persons adversely affected by the conduct.
502 (d) The administrative assessment under this section is
503 in addition to any other penalty, remedy, or sanction that may
504 be imposed under this chapter.
Page 18

be imposed under this chapter.
HB259 Enrolled
505 §8-7B-15
506 (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), all
507 information or reports obtained by the commission from the
508 applicant, licensee, or authorized delegate and all
509 information contained in or related to examination,
510 investigation, operation, or condition reports prepared by, or
511 on behalf of, or for the use of the commission, are
512 confidential and are not subject to disclosure under Article 3
513 of Chapter 12, Title 36.
514 (b) The commission may disclose information not
515 otherwise subject to disclosure under subsection (a) to
516 representatives of state and federal agencies, provided the
517 agencies submit an undertaking to maintain the confidentiality
518 of the information in a record.
519 (c) This section shall not prohibit the commission from
520 disclosing to the public a list of persons licensed under this
521 chapter or the aggregated financial data concerning those
522 licensees.
523 §8-7B-16
524 In any insolvency proceeding of an Alabama qualified
525 payment stablecoin issuer, including any insolvency proceeding
526 administered by the commission, the following shall apply:
527 (1) The claim of a person holding any payment
528 stablecoin issued by the Alabama qualified payment stablecoin
529 issuer shall have priority, on a ratable basis with the claims
530 of other persons holding the payment stablecoin, over the
531 claims of the Alabama qualified payment stablecoin issuer and
532 any other holder of claims against the Alabama qualified
Page 19

any other holder of claims against the Alabama qualified
HB259 Enrolled
533 payment stablecoin issuer, with respect to required payment
534 stablecoin reserves.
535 (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
536 person holding a payment stablecoin issued by the Alabama
537 qualified payment stablecoin issuer shall be deemed to hold a
538 claim.
539 (3) The priority under subdivision (1) shall not apply
540 to claims other than those arising directly from the holding
541 of payment stablecoins.
542 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
543 1, 2026.
Page 20

1, 2026.
HB259 Enrolled
544
545
546
547
548
549
550
551
552
553
554 ________________________________________________
555 Speaker of the House of Representatives
556
557
558
559 ________________________________________________
560 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
561
562
563 House of Representatives
564
565 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
566 was passed by the House 10-Mar-26, as amended.
567
568 John Treadwell
569 Clerk
570
571
572
573
574
575 Senate 31-Mar-26 Passed
576
577
578
Page 21